Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-829.72
State of emergency; powers of Governor; Adjutant General; duty.

(1) Whenever a state of emergency has been declared to exist in this state, the Governor is authorized, upon his or her determination that financial assistance is essential to meet related necessary expenses or serious needs of individuals or families adversely affected by a disaster, emergency, or civil defense emergency that may not be otherwise met from other means of assistance, to (a) accept a grant by the federal government to provide such financial assistance, subject to such terms and conditions as may be imposed upon the grant, and (b) provide assistance from funds appropriated to the Governor's Emergency Program to such individual assistance programs as may be required by terms and conditions of the federal program.

(2) The Adjutant General shall establish such individual assistance programs as shall be necessary to carry out the purposes of subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1975, LB 612, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 43, § 47;

Laws 2003, LB 403, § 11.